Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 4. Unprofessional Conduct and Discipline

§ 2431.
Unprofessional conduct.

Unprofessional conduct is the conduct prohibited by this section, and by

3 V.S.A. § 129a

, whether or not taken by a license holder.

Unprofessional conduct means:

failing to make available, upon request of a person using the licensee’s services, copies of documents in the possession or under the control of the licensee, when those documents have been prepared for and purchased by the user of services;

conduct that evidences moral unfitness to practice the occupation;

any of the following except when reasonably undertaken in an emergency situation in order to protect life, health, or property:

practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope permitted by law;

accepting and performing occupational responsibilities that the licensee knows or has reason to know that he or she is not competent to perform;

performing occupational services that have not been authorized by the consumer or his or her legal representative.

After hearing, the Board may take disciplinary action against a licensee or applicant found guilty of unprofessional conduct. Discipline against an applicant may be a warning, a reprimand, suspension of a license for a specific period of time, or permanent revocation or denial of license.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 46.

§ 2432.
Repealed. 2013, No. 27, § 30.

§ 2433.
Veterinarian-client-patient relationship; veterinarian of record.

The veterinarian-client-patient relationship (VCPR) exists when all of the following conditions have been met:

The veterinarian has assumed the responsibility for making clinical judgments regarding the health of one or more animals and the need for medical treatment, and the client, who is the owner of the animals or their caretaker, has agreed to follow the veterinarian’s instructions;

The veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of those animals to initiate at least a general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical condition of the animals. This means that the veterinarian has recently seen and is personally acquainted with the keeping and care of the animals by virtue of an examination of the animals or by medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animals are kept; and

The veterinarian is readily available or has arranged for emergency coverage for follow-up evaluation of those animals in the event of adverse reactions or failure of the treatment regimen.

Only a licensed veterinarian with a valid VCPR may:

authorize the dispensing of veterinary prescription drugs;

issue a valid veterinary feed directive;

authorize drug distributors to deliver veterinary prescription drugs to a specific client; or

prescribe, order, or otherwise authorize a pharmacist to dispense veterinary prescription drugs to a specific client.

The veterinarian of record (VOR) is the food animal veterinarian responsible for providing appropriate oversight of drug use on a farm premises for specific animals or group of animals.
(c) (1) The veterinarian of record (VOR) is the food animal veterinarian responsible for providing appropriate oversight of drug use on a farm premises for specific animals or group of animals.

If more than one veterinarian or veterinary practice has a working relationship on a farm premises, then the VCPR agreement shall establish which veterinarian has the responsibility for specific animals or animal groups.

A veterinarian who is not the VOR, when providing professional services, is responsible for making provisions for emergency follow-up care and must notify the VOR of his or her findings and recommendations.

Prescriptions from veterinarians are subject to Vermont prescription drug cost containment statutes set forth in 18 V.S.A. chapter 91.

Establishment of a VCPR for the sole purpose of the sale of drugs or increased sales of a particular brand of drug product is not a valid or ethical reason for having a VCPR.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 48

, § 17.